California statutes. Business and Professions Code
As used in Sections 10151 and 10153.2, “accredited institution” shall mean a college or university that either:

(a) Is accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges, or by any other regional accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education.

(b) In the judgment of the commissioner, has a real estate curriculum equivalent in quality to that of the institutions accredited pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 17.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10153.6.

All real estate broker licenses issued by the commissioner shall be for a period of four years.

Applicants shall qualify in the appropriate examination and satisfy all other requirements prior to issuance of the license.

The four-year license may be renewed upon filing the required application and fee, and complying with the provisions of Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 10170).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10153.7.

All real estate salesperson licenses issued by the commissioner shall be for a period of four years.

Applicants must qualify in the appropriate examination and satisfy all other requirements prior to issuance of the license.

The four-year license may be renewed upon filing the required application and fee, and complying with the provisions of Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 10170).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 263, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10153.8.

When an applicant for a real estate license fails the qualifying examination, the applicant may apply for reexamination by filing the appropriate application and fee.

The application and fee for reexamination shall be filed and the reexamination taken within the two-year period following the date the application for examination was filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 9.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10156.2.

An application on the form prescribed by the commissioner for the renewal of a license, filed before midnight of the last day of the period for which a previous license was issued, accompanied by the applicable renewal fee and good faith evidence of compliance with the provisions of Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 10170), entitles the applicant to continue operating under their existing license after its specified expiration date, if not previously suspended or revoked.

If the commissioner determines that the applicant has not complied with the continuing education requirements, they shall either (1) advise the applicant of the applicability of Section 10171.2 on an extended period for compliance; or (2) advise the applicant
 that their rights to operate under the prior license will expire five days from the date the notice is mailed, or on the date the license would normally expire, whichever is later; and the commissioner’s reason for that determination, and the right of the applicant to request a hearing on the decision. Nothing in this section shall prevent the commissioner from delaying the renewal of the license of a licensee pursuant to Section 10177.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 18.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10156.5.

The commissioner may issue a restricted license to a person:

(a) Who is or has been licensed under this chapter and who has been found by the commissioner after a hearing to have violated provisions of Division 4 of this code where such violation would justify the suspension or revocation of the license.

(b) Who is applying for a license under this chapter, who has met the examination and experience requirements, but who has been found by the commissioner after a hearing to have failed to have made a satisfactory showing that he meets all of the
 other requirements for the license applied for, where such failure would justify the denial of the license applied for.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 944.)
-------------------------------------------

10156.6.

A restricted license issued pursuant to Section 10156.5 as the commissioner in their discretion finds advisable in the public interest may be restricted:

(a) By term.

(b) To employment by a particular real estate broker, if a salesperson.

(c) By conditions to be observed in the exercise of the privileges granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 19.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10156.7.

(a) A restricted license issued pursuant to Section 10156.5 does not confer any property right in the privileges to be exercised thereunder, and the holder of a restricted license does not have the right to the renewal of the license.

(b) The commissioner may without hearing issue an order suspending the licensee’s right to further exercise any privileges granted under a restricted license pending final determination made after formal hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 20.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10156.8.

As one of the conditions to the issuance of a restricted license authorized by Section 10156.5 the commissioner may require the filing of surety bonds in such form and condition as he may require in respect to the restricted licensee for the protection of persons or classes of persons with whom said licensee may deal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 660.)
-------------------------------------------

10157.

No real estate license gives authority to do any act specified in this chapter to any person, other than the person to whom the license is issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

10158.

When a real estate license is issued to a corporation, if it desires any of its officers other than the officer designated by it pursuant to Section 10211, to act under its license as a real estate broker, it shall procure an additional license to retain each of those additional officers. In the event of death or incapacity of a sole designated broker-officer, a corporation may operate as a licensee without interruption under its existing
 license if notice of the death or incapacity and an application for a new designated officer is filed with the department before midnight of the 10th business day after the event.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 36.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10159.

Each officer of a corporation through whom it is licensed to act as a real estate broker need not be a licensed real estate broker, but if not, is authorized only to act as such for and on behalf of the corporation as an officer. This does not preclude a designated corporate officer who has a separate individual license from conducting licensed activity for another entity if the entity for which he or she acts is clearly disclosed and apparent
 to any member of the public using his or her services outside the corporation.

When a corporation wishes to act as a real estate broker, the corporation shall be licensed by the department through qualified broker-officers, who have either passed the broker license examination and are now qualified to obtain a broker license, or who are currently licensed as real estate brokers. An officer of a corporation through whom it is licensed to act need not maintain an individual broker’s license, but is otherwise subject to all duties and responsibilities of a licensed broker.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 37.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10159.2.

(a) The officer designated by a corporate broker licensee pursuant to Section 10211 shall be responsible for the supervision and control of the activities conducted on behalf of the corporation by its officers and employees as necessary to secure full compliance with the provisions of this division, including the supervision of salespersons licensed to the corporation in the performance of acts for which a real estate license is required.

(b) A corporate broker licensee that has procured additional licenses in accordance with Section 10158 through officers other than the officer designated
 pursuant to Section 10211 may, by appropriate resolution of its board of directors, assign supervisory responsibility over salespersons licensed to the corporation to its broker-officers.

(c) A certified copy of any resolution of the board of directors assigning supervisory responsibility over real estate salespersons licensed to the corporation shall be filed with the Real Estate Commissioner within five days after the adoption or modification thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 595.)
-------------------------------------------

10159.5.

(a) (1) Every person applying for a license under this chapter who desires to have the license issued under a fictitious business name shall file with the application a certified copy of their fictitious business name statement filed with the county clerk pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17900) of Part 3 of Division 7.

(2) A responsible broker may, by contract, permit a salesperson to do all of the following:

(A) File an application on behalf of a responsible broker with a county clerk to obtain a fictitious business name.

(B) Deliver to the department an application, signed by the responsible broker, requesting the department’s approval to use a county approved fictitious business name that shall be identified with the responsible broker’s license number.

(C) Pay for any fees associated with filing an application with a county or the department to obtain or use a fictitious business name.

(D) Maintain ownership of a fictitious business name, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10159.7, that may be used subject to the control of the responsible broker.

(b) (1) A salesperson using a fictitious business name authorized by subdivision (a), shall use that name only as permitted by the responsible
 broker.

(2) This section does not change a real estate broker’s duties under this division to supervise a salesperson.

(c) A person applying to a county for a fictitious business name pursuant to subdivision (a) may file the application in the county or counties where the fictitious business name will be used.

(d) Advertising and solicitation materials, including business cards, print or electronic media and “for sale” signage, using a fictitious business name obtained in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall include the responsible broker’s identity, as defined in Section 10015.4, in a manner equally as prominent as the fictitious business name.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 10140.6, advertising and solicitation materials, including print or electronic media and “for sale” signage, containing a fictitious business name obtained in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall
 include the name and license number of the salesperson who is using the fictitious business name.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 10185, a violation of this section is not a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 55.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10159.6.

All of the following apply to use of a team name, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 10159.7:

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 10140.6, advertising and solicitation materials that contain a team name, including print or electronic media and “for sale” signage, shall include, and display in a conspicuous and prominent manner, the team name
 and the name and license number of at least one of the licensed members of the team.

(b) The responsible broker’s identity shall be displayed as prominently and conspicuously as the team name in all advertising and solicitation materials.

(c) The advertising and solicitation materials shall not contain terms that imply the existence of a real estate entity independent of the responsible broker.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 10185, a violation of this section is not a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 38.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10159.7.

(a) For the purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Fictitious business name” means a professional identity or brand name under which activity requiring a real estate license is conducted and the use of which is subject to approval by the department pursuant to Section 10159.5.

(2) “Ownership of a fictitious business name” means the right to use, renew, and control the use of a fictitious business name obtained in accordance with Section 10159.5.

(3) “Team name” means a professional identity or brand name used by a salesperson, and one or more other real estate licensees, for the provision of real estate licensed services. Notwithstanding any other law, the use of a team name does not require that a separate license be issued for that name pursuant to Section 10159.5. A team name does not constitute a fictitious business name for purposes of this part or any other law or for purposes of filing a fictitious business name statement with an application as required by subdivision (a) of Section 10159.5 if all of the following apply:

(A) The name is used by two or more real estate licensees who work
 together to provide licensed real estate services, or who represent themselves to the public as being a part of a team, group, or association to provide those services.

(B) The name includes the surname of at least one of the licensee members of the team, group, or association in conjunction with the term “associates,” “group,” or “team.”

(C) The name does not include any term or terms, such as “real estate broker,” “real estate brokerage,” “broker,” or “brokerage” or any other term that would lead a member of the public to believe that the team is offering real estate brokerage services, that imply or suggest the existence of a real estate entity independent of a responsible broker.

(b) Nothing in this section changes a real estate broker’s duties under this division to supervise a salesperson.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 39.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10161.5.

When the holder of a real estate broker’s or salesperson’s license is required to relinquish his or her license to assume an office in local, state, or federal government, he or she may have it reinstated at any time within six months of termination of his or her service in office upon payment of the appropriate renewal fee, and compliance with the provisions of Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 10170) of this chapter, if
 the relinquished license was issued four or more years prior to his or her application for reinstatement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 177, Sec. 27.   (AB 685)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10161.8.

(a) The commissioner shall specify the manner in which a responsible broker shall provide notice to the commissioner of an affiliation with a real estate licensee or by which a real estate licensee shall provide notice of a change of address or affiliation.

(b) Whenever a responsible broker retains a real estate salesperson to conduct activities requiring a
 license, the responsible broker shall notify the commissioner in a manner specified by the commissioner.

(c) Whenever a responsible broker retains a real estate broker to conduct activities requiring a license, the responsible broker shall provide notice to the commissioner in a manner specified by the commissioner.

(d) Whenever an affiliation with a real estate licensee is terminated, the responsible broker shall provide notice to the commissioner in a manner specified by the commissioner.

(e) Whenever a real estate licensee acquires a business address different from the address shown in the records maintained by the commissioner, the licensee shall notify the commissioner in a manner specified by the commissioner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 42.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10162.

(a) Every licensed real estate broker shall have and maintain a definite place of business in the State of California that serves as the broker’s office for the transaction of business. This office shall be the place where the broker’s license is displayed and where personal consultations with clients are held.

(b) A real estate license does not authorize the licensee to do business except from the location stipulated in the real estate license as issued or as altered pursuant to Section 10161.8.

(c) (1) Every applicant for a real estate broker or salesperson license shall provide to the commissioner their
 current office or mailing address, a current telephone number, and a current electronic mail address that they maintain or use to perform any activity that requires a real estate license at which the department may contact the licensee.

(2) Every real estate broker and salesperson licensee shall inform the commissioner of any change to their office or mailing address, telephone number, or electronic mail address no later than 30 days after making the change.

(3) The licensee email address provided to the department shall not be considered a public record and shall not be disclosed pursuant to a request
 under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), unless required by an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(4) Information sent from an email account of the department to a valid email address provided by an applicant or licensee is presumed to have been delivered to the email address provided.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 10185, a violation of this section is not a misdemeanor.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “valid email address” means an email address at which the applicant or licensee is currently receiving email at the time the application or license renewal is submitted to the department, or has been updated pursuant to paragraph
 (2) of subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 21.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10163.

If the applicant for a real estate broker’s license maintains more than one place of business within the State he shall apply for and procure an additional license for each branch office so maintained by him. Every such application shall state the name of the person and the location of the place or places of business for which such license is desired. The commissioner may determine whether or not a real estate broker is doing a real estate brokerage business at or from any particular location which requires him to have a branch office license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

10164.

(a) A responsible broker or corporate designated broker officer may appoint a licensee as a manager of a branch office or division of the responsible broker’s or corporate designated broker officer’s real estate business and delegate to the appointed manager the responsibility to oversee day-to-day operations, supervise the licensed activities of licensees, and supervise clerical staff employed in the branch office or
 division.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the responsibilities of a responsible broker or a corporate designated broker officer pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 10177. A licensee accepting appointment as a manager shall be subject to disciplinary action pursuant to Section 10165 for failure to properly supervise licensed activity pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Appointment of a manager shall only be made by means of a written contract in which the manager accepts the delegated responsibility. The appointing responsible broker or corporate designated broker officer shall retain a copy of the contract and send a notice to the department, in a form approved by the commissioner, identifying the appointed manager and the branch office or division the manager is appointed to supervise.

(d) A licensee shall not be appointed as a manager if any of the following apply:

(1) The licensee holds a restricted license.

(2) The licensee is or has been subject to an order of debarment.

(3) The licensee is a salesperson with less than two years of full-time real estate experience within five years preceding the appointment.

(e) Whenever an appointment of a branch manager is terminated or changed, the responsible broker or corporate designated broker officer shall immediately notify the commissioner thereof in writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 43.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10165.

For a violation of Section 10161.8, 10162, 10163, or subdivision (b) of Section 10164, the commissioner may temporarily suspend or permanently revoke the license of the real estate licensee in accordance with this part relating to hearings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 56.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10165.1.

This article does not require the department to post or publish electronic mail addresses or telephone numbers collected pursuant to Section 10150, 10151, or 10162, and if released by the department, the information shall be released in a way that discourages its use in unauthorized or unsolicited commercial electronic mail advertisement programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 12.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.1. Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licenses [10166.01. - 10166.17.]

10166.01.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “SAFE Act” means the federal Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-289).

(b) (1) “Mortgage loan originator” means an individual who takes a residential mortgage loan application or offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan for compensation or gain.

(2) Mortgage loan originator does not include any of the following:

(A) An individual who performs purely administrative or
 clerical tasks on behalf of a person meeting the definition of a mortgage
 loan originator, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c) of Section 10166.03. The term “administrative or clerical tasks” means the receipt, collection, and distribution of information common for the processing or underwriting of a loan in the mortgage industry and communication with a consumer to obtain information necessary for the processing or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan.

(B) An individual that only performs real estate brokerage services, as defined in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 10131, unless that person is compensated by a lender, other mortgage loan originator, or by any agent of any lender or other mortgage loan originator.

(C) An individual who solely renegotiates terms for existing mortgage loans held or serviced by
 their employer and who does not otherwise act as a mortgage loan originator, unless the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development or a court of competent jurisdiction determines that the SAFE Act requires such an employee to be licensed as a mortgage loan originator under state laws implementing the SAFE Act.

(D) An individual that is solely involved in extensions of credit relating to timeshare plans, as that term is defined in Section 101(53D) of Title 11 of the United States Code.

(E) An individual licensed or registered as a mortgage loan originator pursuant to the Financial Code and the SAFE Act.

(c) “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” means a mortgage licensing system developed and
 maintained by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators for the licensing and registration of mortgage loan originators.

(d) “Residential mortgage loan” means any loan primarily for personal, family, or household use that is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other equivalent consensual security interest on a dwelling, or residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling. “Dwelling” means a residential structure that contains one to four units, whether or not that structure is attached to real property. The term includes an individual condominium unit, cooperative unit, mobilehome, or trailer, if it is used as a residence.

(e) “Unique identifier” means a number or other
 identifier assigned by protocols established by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

(f) “Loan processor or underwriter” means an individual who performs clerical or support duties as an employee at the direction of, and subject to the supervision and instruction of, a mortgage loan originator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 57.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.02.

(a) A real estate broker who acts pursuant to Section 10131.1 or subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 10131, and who makes, arranges, or services loans secured by real property containing one to four residential units, and any salesperson who acts in a similar capacity under the supervision of that broker, shall notify the department by January 31, 2010, or within 30 days of commencing that activity, whichever is later. The notification shall be made in writing, as directed, on a form that is acceptable to the commissioner.

(b) No individual may engage in business as a mortgage loan originator under this article without first doing both of the following:

(1) Obtaining and maintaining a real estate license pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 10150).

(2) Obtaining and maintaining a real estate license endorsement pursuant to this article identifying that individual as a licensed mortgage loan originator.

(c) License endorsements shall be valid for a period of one year and shall expire on December 31 each year.

(d) Applicants for a mortgage loan originator license endorsement shall apply in a form prescribed by the commissioner. Each form shall contain content as set forth by rule, regulation, instruction, or procedure of the commissioner.

(e) In order to fulfill the purposes of this article, the commissioner may establish relationships or contracts with the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry or other entities designated by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this article.

(f) A real estate broker or salesperson who fails to notify the department pursuant to subdivision (a), or who fails to obtain a license endorsement required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), shall be assessed a penalty of fifty dollars ($50) per day for each day written notification has not been received or a license endorsement has not been obtained, up to and including the 30th day after the first day of the assessment penalty. On
 and after the 31st day, the penalty is one hundred dollars ($100) per day, not to exceed a total penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), regardless of the number of days, until the department receives the written notification or the licensee obtains the license endorsement. Penalties for violations of subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be additive.

(g) The commissioner may suspend or revoke the license of a real estate broker or salesperson who fails to pay a penalty imposed pursuant to this section. In addition, the commissioner may bring an action in an appropriate court of this state to collect payment of that penalty.

(h) All penalties paid or collected under this section shall be deposited into the Consumer Recovery Account of the Real Estate Fund and shall, upon
 appropriation by the Legislature, be available for expenditure for the purposes specified in Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 10470).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 58.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.03.

(a) A loan processor or underwriter who does not represent to the public, through advertising or other means of communicating or providing information, including the use of business cards, stationery, brochures, signs, rate lists, or other promotional items, that the individual can or will perform any of the activities of a mortgage loan originator shall not be required to obtain a license endorsement as a mortgage loan originator.

(b) An individual engaging solely in loan processor or underwriter activities shall not represent to the public, through advertising or other means of communicating or providing information including the use of business cards, stationery, brochures,
 signs, rate lists, or other promotional items, that the individual can or will perform any of the activities of a mortgage loan originator.

(c) An independent contractor who is employed by a mortgage loan originator may not engage in the activities of a loan processor or underwriter for a residential mortgage loan unless the independent contractor loan processor or underwriter obtains and maintains an endorsement as a mortgage loan originator under this article. Each independent contractor loan processor or underwriter who obtains and maintains an endorsement as a mortgage loan originator under this article shall have and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 59.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.04.

(a) In connection with an application to the commissioner for a license endorsement as a mortgage loan originator, every applicant shall furnish to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry information concerning the applicant’s identity, including the following:

(1) Fingerprint images and related information, for purposes of performing a federal, or both a state and federal, criminal history background check.

(2) Personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, including the submission of authorization for the Nationwide Multistate Licensing
 System and Registry and the commissioner to obtain both of the following:

(A) An independent credit report from a consumer reporting agency.

(B) Information related to any administrative, civil, or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.

(b) The commissioner may ask the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry to obtain state criminal history background check information on applicants described in subdivision (a) using the procedures set forth in subdivisions (c) and (d).

(c) If the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry electronically submits fingerprint images and related information, as required by the
 Department of Justice, for an applicant for a mortgage loan originator license endorsement, to the Department of Justice for the purposes of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state convictions and state arrests, and as to the existence and content of a record of state arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on their recognizance pending trial or appeal, the Department of Justice shall provide an electronic response to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, and shall provide the same electronic response to the department.

(d) The Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry may request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification
 service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for persons described in subdivision (a). The Department of Justice shall provide the same electronic response to the department.

(e) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the requests described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 60.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.05.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner shall not issue a license endorsement to act as a mortgage loan originator to an applicant unless the commissioner makes all of the following findings:

(a) The applicant has never had a mortgage loan originator license revoked in any governmental jurisdiction, except that a subsequent formal vacation of a revocation shall not be deemed a revocation.

(b) (1) The applicant has not been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony in a domestic, foreign, or military court during the seven-year period preceding the date of the application for licensing, or at any time preceding the
 date of application, if the felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, a breach of trust, or money laundering. Whether a particular crime is classified as a felony shall be determined by the law of the jurisdiction in which an individual is convicted.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, an expunged or pardoned felony conviction shall not require denial of an application. However, the commissioner may consider the underlying crime, facts, or circumstances of an expunged or pardoned felony conviction when determining the eligibility of an applicant for licensure under this subdivision or subdivision (c).

(c) The applicant has demonstrated such financial responsibility, character, and general fitness as to command the confidence of the community and warrant a determination that the mortgage loan originator will operate honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the purposes of the
 article.

(d) The applicant has complied with the education and written testing requirements in Section 10166.06.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.   (SB 217)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.051.

In addition to any penalties authorized by regulations adopted pursuant to Section 10166.15, the commissioner may do one or more of the following, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing:

(a) Deny, suspend, revoke, restrict, or decline to renew a mortgage loan originator license endorsement for a violation of this article, or any rules or regulations adopted hereunder.

(b) Deny, suspend, revoke, condition, or decline to renew a mortgage loan originator license endorsement, if an applicant or endorsement holder fails at any time to meet the requirements of Section 10166.05 or 10166.09, or withholds information or makes a material misstatement in
 an application for a license endorsement or license endorsement renewal.

(c) Issue orders or directives to licensees who hold mortgage loan originator license endorsements, as follows:

(1) Order or direct persons subject to this article to desist and refrain from conducting business, including immediate temporary orders to desist and refrain.

(2) Order or direct persons subject to this article to cease any harmful activities or violations of this article, including immediate temporary orders to desist and refrain.

(3) Enter immediate temporary orders to cease business under a license endorsement if the commissioner determines that the license endorsement was erroneously granted or the endorsement holder is currently in violation of this article.

(4) Order or direct any other affirmative action the commissioner deems necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 287, Sec. 5.   (SB 1137)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.06.

(a) In addition to the requirements of Section 10153, an applicant for a license endorsement as a mortgage loan originator shall complete at least 20 hours of education courses, which shall include at least the following:

(1) Three hours of federal law and regulations.

(2) Three hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection, and fair lending issues.

(3) Two hours of training related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

(b) For
 purposes of this section, education courses are only acceptable if they have been reviewed and approved, or otherwise deemed acceptable, by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, in accordance with the SAFE Act. Education may be offered in a classroom, online, or by any other means approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, in accordance with the SAFE Act.

(c) A person who successfully completes the education requirements approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry in any state other than California shall be granted credit by the commissioner toward completion of the education requirements of this section.

(d) Before being issued a license endorsement to act as a mortgage loan originator, an individual shall pass
 a qualified written test developed or otherwise deemed acceptable by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry and administered by a test provider approved or otherwise deemed acceptable by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

(e) A written test shall not be treated as a qualified written test for purposes of this section, unless the test adequately measures the applicant’s knowledge and comprehension in the following subject areas: ethics, federal law and regulation pertaining to mortgage origination, state law and regulation pertaining to mortgage origination, and federal and state law and regulation relating to fraud, consumer protection, the nontraditional mortgage marketplace, and fair lending issues.

(f) This section does not
 prohibit a test provider approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry from providing a test at the location of the employer of the applicant or any subsidiary or affiliate of the employer of the applicant, or any entity with which the applicant holds an exclusive arrangement to conduct the business of a mortgage loan originator.

(g) An individual shall not be considered to have passed a qualified written test administered pursuant to this section unless the individual achieves a test score of not less than 75 percent correct answers to questions.

(h) An individual who fails the qualified written test may retake the test, although at least 30 days must pass between each retesting, except as provided in subdivision (i).

(i) An applicant who fails three consecutive tests shall wait at least six months before retesting.

(j) A mortgage loan originator who fails to maintain a valid license endorsement for a period of five years or longer or who fails to register as a mortgage loan originator shall retake the qualified written test.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 61.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.07.
